Nebraska, session 109, LB467.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB467 LB467
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) A health carrier or utilization review agent shall,
on or before January 1, 2028, implement and maintain a prior
authorization application programming interface, pursuant to 45 C.F.R.
156.223(b), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025, to be in
effect on January 1, 2028.
(2) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to a prior
authorization request for coverage of drugs.
(3) As used in this section, drug means the same as defined in 45
C.F.R. 156.221(b)(1)(v), as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025.
Sec. 2. Section 44-5416, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
44-5416 Sections 44-5416 to 44-5431 and section 1 of this act shall
be known and may be cited as the Utilization Review Act.
Sec. 3. Original section 44-5416, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-